Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3347
Rules and regulations.

The Title IV-D Division shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 43-3341 to 43-3347.

Laws 1999, LB 637, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 32.